California statutes. Probate Code
(b) An attorney-in-fact is not in violation of the duty provided in subdivision (a) solely because the attorney-in-fact also benefits from acting for the principal, has conflicting interests in relation to the property, care, or affairs of the principal, or acts in an inconsistent manner regarding the respective interests of the principal and the attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4233.

(a) The attorney-in-fact shall keep the principal’s property separate and distinct from other property in a manner adequate to identify the property clearly as belonging to the principal.

(b) An attorney-in-fact holding property for a principal complies with subdivision (a) if the property is held in the name of the principal or in the name of the attorney-in-fact as attorney-in-fact for the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4234.

(a) To the extent reasonably practicable under the circumstances, an attorney-in-fact has a duty to keep in regular contact with the principal, to communicate with the principal, and to follow the instructions of the principal.

(b) With court approval, the attorney-in-fact may disobey instructions of the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4235.

If the principal becomes wholly or partially incapacitated, or if there is a question concerning the capacity of the principal to give instructions to and supervise the attorney-in-fact, the attorney-in-fact may consult with a person previously designated by the principal for this purpose, and may also consult with and obtain information needed to carry out the attorney-in-fact’s duties from the principal’s spouse, physician, attorney, accountant, a member of the principal’s family, or other person, business entity, or government agency with respect to matters to be undertaken on the principal’s behalf and affecting the principal’s personal affairs, welfare, family, property, and business interests. A person from whom information is requested shall disclose relevant information to the attorney-in-fact. Disclosure under this section is not a waiver of any privilege that may apply to the information disclosed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4236.

(a) The attorney-in-fact shall keep records of all transactions entered into by the attorney-in-fact on behalf of the principal.

(b) The attorney-in-fact does not have a duty to make an account of transactions entered into on behalf of the principal, except in the following circumstances:

(1) At any time requested by the principal.

(2) Where the power of attorney requires the attorney-in-fact to account and specifies to whom the account is to be made.

(3) On request by the conservator of the estate of the principal while the principal is living.

(4) On request by the principal’s personal representative or successor in interest after the death of the principal.

(5) Pursuant to court order.

(c) The following persons are entitled to examine and copy the records kept by the attorney-in-fact:

(1) The principal.

(2) The conservator of the estate of the principal while the principal is living.

(3) The principal’s personal representative or successor in interest after the death of the principal.

(4) Any other person, pursuant to court order.

(d) This section is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4237.

An attorney-in-fact with special skills has a duty to apply the full extent of those skills.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4238.

(a) On termination of an attorney-in-fact’s authority, the attorney-in-fact shall promptly deliver possession or control of the principal’s property as follows:

(1) If the principal is not incapacitated, to the principal or as directed by the principal.

(2) If the principal is incapacitated, to the following persons with the following priority:

(A) To a qualified successor attorney-in-fact.

(B) As to any community property, to the principal’s spouse.

(C) To the principal’s conservator of the estate or guardian of the estate.

(3) In the case of the death of the principal, to the principal’s personal representative, if any, or the principal’s successors.

(b) On termination of an attorney-in-fact’s authority, the attorney-in-fact shall deliver copies of any records relating to transactions undertaken on the principal’s behalf that are requested by the person to whom possession or control of the property is delivered.

(c) Termination of an attorney-in-fact’s authority does not relieve the attorney-in-fact of any duty to render an account of actions taken as attorney-in-fact.

(d) The attorney-in-fact has the powers reasonably necessary under the circumstances to perform the duties provided by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Authority of Attorneys-in-Fact [4260. - 4266.]

4260.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), this article applies to all powers of attorney under this division.

(b) Sections 4261 and 4263 do not apply to the provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 4400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4261.

If a power of attorney grants general authority to an attorney-in-fact and is not limited to one or more express actions, subjects, or purposes for which general authority is conferred, the attorney-in-fact has all the authority to act that a person having the capacity to contract may carry out through an attorney-in-fact specifically authorized to take the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4262.

Subject to this article, if a power of attorney grants limited authority to an attorney-in-fact, the attorney-in-fact has the following authority:

(a) The authority granted in the power of attorney, as limited with respect to permissible actions, subjects, or purposes.

(b) The authority incidental, necessary, or proper to carry out the granted authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4263.

(a) A power of attorney may grant authority to the attorney-in-fact by incorporating powers by reference to another statute, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Powers of attorneys-in-fact provided by the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act (Part 3 (commencing with Section 4400)).

(2) Powers of guardians and conservators provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2350) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2400) of Part 4 of Division 4.

(3) Powers of trustees provided by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16200) of Part 4 of Division 9.

(b) Incorporation by reference to another statute includes any amendments made to the incorporated provisions after the date of execution of the power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4264.

An attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney may perform any of the following acts on behalf of the principal or with the property of the principal only if the power of attorney expressly grants that authority to the attorney-in-fact:

(a) Create, modify, revoke, or terminate a trust, in whole or in part. If a power of attorney under this division empowers the attorney-in-fact to modify or revoke a trust created by the principal, the trust may be modified or revoked by the attorney-in-fact only as provided in the trust instrument.

(b) Fund with the principal’s property a trust not created by the principal or a person authorized to create a
 trust on behalf of the principal.

(c) Make or revoke a gift of the principal’s property in trust or otherwise.

(d) Exercise the right to reject, disclaim, release, or consent to a reduction in, or modification of, a share in, or payment from, an estate, trust, or other fund on behalf of the principal. This subdivision does not limit the attorney-in-fact’s authority to disclaim a detrimental transfer to the principal with the approval of the court.

(e) Create or change survivorship interests in the principal’s property or in property in which the principal may have an interest.

(f) Designate or change the designation of beneficiaries to receive any property, benefit, or contract right on the principal’s death.

(g) Make a loan to the attorney-in-fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 113, Sec. 2.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4265.

A power of attorney may not authorize an attorney-in-fact to make, publish, declare, amend, or revoke the principal’s will.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4266.

The grant of authority to an attorney-in-fact, whether by the power of attorney, by statute, or by the court, does not in itself require or permit the exercise of the power. The exercise of authority by an attorney-in-fact is subject to the attorney-in-fact’s fiduciary duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Relations With Third Persons [4300. - 4310.]

4300.

A third person shall accord an attorney-in-fact acting pursuant to the provisions of a power of attorney the same rights and privileges that would be accorded the principal if the principal were personally present and seeking to act. However, a third person is not required to honor the attorney-in-fact’s authority or conduct business with the attorney-in-fact if the principal cannot require the third person to act or conduct business in the same circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4301.

A third person may rely on, contract with, and deal with an attorney-in-fact with respect to the subjects and purposes encompassed or expressed in the power of attorney without regard to whether the power of attorney expressly authorizes the specific act, transaction, or decision by the attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4302.

When requested to engage in transactions with an attorney-in-fact, a third person, before incurring any duty to comply with the power of attorney, may require the attorney-in-fact to provide identification, specimens of the signatures of the principal and the attorney-in-fact, and any other information reasonably necessary or appropriate to identify the principal and the attorney-in-fact and to facilitate the actions of the third person in transacting business with the attorney-in-fact. A third person may require an attorney-in-fact to provide the current and permanent residence addresses of the principal before agreeing to engage in a transaction with the attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4303.

(a) A third person who acts in good faith reliance on a power of attorney is not liable to the principal or to any other person for so acting if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The power of attorney is presented to the third person by the attorney-in-fact designated in the power of attorney.

(2) The power of attorney appears on its face to be valid.

(3) The power of attorney includes a notary public’s certificate of acknowledgment or is signed by two witnesses.

(b) Nothing in this section is intended to create an implication that a third person is liable for acting in reliance on a power of attorney under circumstances where the requirements of subdivision (a) are not satisfied. Nothing in this section affects any immunity that may otherwise exist apart from this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4304.

(a) The death of a principal who has executed a power of attorney, whether durable or nondurable, does not revoke or terminate the agency as to the attorney-in-fact or a third person who, without actual knowledge of the principal’s death, acts in good faith under the power of attorney. Any action so taken, unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds the principal’s successors in interest.

(b) The incapacity of a principal who has previously executed a nondurable power of attorney does not revoke or terminate the agency as to the attorney-in-fact or a third person who, without actual knowledge of the incapacity of the principal, acts in good faith under the power of attorney. Any action so taken, unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds the principal and the principal’s successors in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4305.

(a) As to acts undertaken in good faith reliance thereon, an affidavit executed by the attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney, whether durable or nondurable, stating that, at the time of the exercise of the power, the attorney-in-fact did not have actual knowledge of the termination of the power of attorney or the attorney-in-fact’s authority by revocation or of the principal’s death or incapacity is conclusive proof of the nonrevocation or nontermination of the power at that time. If the exercise of the power of attorney requires execution and delivery of any instrument that is recordable, the affidavit when authenticated for record is likewise recordable.

(b) This section does not affect any provision in a power of attorney for its termination by expiration of time or occurrence of an event other than express revocation or a change in the principal’s capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4306.

(a) If an attorney-in-fact furnishes an affidavit pursuant to Section 4305, whether voluntarily or on demand, a third person dealing with the attorney-in-fact who refuses to accept the exercise of the attorney-in-fact’s authority referred to in the affidavit is liable for attorney’s fees incurred in an action or proceeding necessary to confirm the attorney-in-fact’s qualifications or authority, unless the court determines that the third person believed in good faith that the attorney-in-fact was not qualified or was attempting to exceed or improperly exercise the attorney-in-fact’s authority.

(b) The failure of a third person to demand an affidavit pursuant to Section 4305 does not affect the protection provided the third person by this chapter, and no inference as to whether a third person has acted in good faith may be drawn from the failure to demand an affidavit from the attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4307.

(a) A copy of a power of attorney certified under this section has the same force and effect as the original power of attorney.

(b) A copy of a power of attorney may be certified by any of the following:

(1) An attorney authorized to practice law in this state.

(2) A notary public in this state.

(3) An official of a state or of a political subdivision who is authorized to make certifications.

(c) The certification shall state that the certifying person has examined the original power of attorney and the copy and that the copy is a true and correct copy of the original power of attorney.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to create an implication that a third person may be liable for acting in good faith reliance on a copy of a power of attorney that has not been certified under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 9.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4308.

(a) A third person who conducts activities through employees is not charged under this chapter with actual knowledge of any fact relating to a power of attorney, nor of a change in the authority of an attorney-in-fact, unless both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The information is received at a home office or a place where there is an employee with responsibility to act on the information.

(2) The employee has a reasonable time in which to act on the information using the procedure and facilities that are available to the third person in the regular course of its operations.

(b) Knowledge of an employee in one branch or office of an entity that conducts business through branches or multiple offices is not attributable to an employee in another branch or office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4309.

Nothing in this chapter requires a third person to engage in any transaction with an attorney-in-fact if the attorney-in-fact has previously breached any agreement with the third person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4310.

Without limiting the generality of Section 4300, nothing in this chapter requires a financial institution to open a deposit account for a principal at the request of an attorney-in-fact if the principal is not currently a depositor of the financial institution or to make a loan to the attorney-in-fact on the principal’s behalf if the principal is not currently a borrower of the financial institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. UNIFORM STATUTORY FORM POWER OF ATTORNEY [4400. - 4465.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4400. - 4409.]

4400.

This part may be cited as the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4401.

The following statutory form power of attorney is legally sufficient when the requirements of Section 4402 are satisfied:

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * 

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The Uniform Statutory Form 
 Power of Attorney appears in the hard-copy publication of
 the 
 chaptered bill. See Sec. 3, Chapter 113 (pp. 3–5), Statutes of 2011. 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 113, Sec. 3.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text. The Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney appears on pages 3 to 5 of Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

4402.

A statutory form power of attorney under this part is legally sufficient if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The wording of the form complies substantially with Section 4401. A form does not fail to comply substantially with Section 4401 merely because the form does not include the provisions of Section 4401 relating to designation of co-agents. A form does not fail to comply substantially with Section 4401 merely because the form uses the sentence “Revocation of the power of
 attorney is not effective as to a third party until the third party learns of the revocation” in place of the sentence “Revocation of the power of attorney is not effective as to a third party until the third party has actual knowledge of the revocation,” in which case the form shall be interpreted as if it contained the sentence “Revocation of the power of attorney is not effective as to a third party until the third party has actual knowledge of the revocation.”

(b) The form is properly completed.

(c) The signature of the principal is acknowledged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 10.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4403.

If the line in front of (N) of the statutory form under Section 4401 is initialed, an initial on the line in front of any other power does not limit the powers granted by line (N).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4404.

A statutory form power of attorney legally sufficient under this part is durable to the extent that the power of attorney contains language, such as “This power of attorney will continue to be effective even though I become incapacitated,” showing the intent of the principal that the power granted may be exercised notwithstanding later incapacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4405.

(a) A statutory form power of attorney under this part that limits the power to take effect upon the occurrence of a specified event or contingency, including, but not limited to, the incapacity of the principal, may contain a provision designating one or more persons who, by a written declaration under penalty of perjury, have the power to determine conclusively that the specified event or contingency has occurred.

(b) A statutory form power of attorney that contains the provision
 described in subdivision (a) becomes effective when the person or persons designated in the power of attorney execute a written declaration under penalty of perjury that the specified event or contingency has occurred, and any person may act in reliance on the written declaration without liability to the principal or to any other person, regardless whether the specified event or contingency has actually occurred.

(c) The provision described in subdivision (a) may be included in the “Special Instructions” portion of the form set forth in Section 4401.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not provide the exclusive method by which a statutory form power of attorney under this part may be limited to take effect upon the occurrence of a specified event or contingency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4406.

(a) If a third person to whom a properly executed statutory form power of attorney under this part is presented refuses to honor the agent’s authority under the power of attorney within a reasonable time, the third person may be compelled to honor the agent’s authority under the power of attorney in an action brought against the third person for this purpose, except that the third person may not be compelled to honor the agent’s authority if the principal could not compel the third person to act in the same circumstances.

(b) If an action is brought under this section, the court shall award attorney’s fees to the agent if the court finds that the third person acted unreasonably in refusing to accept the agent’s authority under the statutory form power of attorney.

(c) For the purpose of subdivision (b), and without limiting any other grounds that may constitute a reasonable refusal to accept an agent’s authority under a statutory form power of attorney, a third person shall not be deemed to have acted unreasonably in refusing to accept an agent’s authority if the refusal is authorized or required by state or federal statute or regulation.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a third person’s refusal to accept an agent’s authority under a statutory form power of attorney under this part shall be deemed unreasonable if the only reason for
 the refusal is that the power of attorney is not on a form prescribed by the third person to whom the power of attorney is presented.

(e) The remedy provided in this section is cumulative and nonexclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4407.

The provisions of this division apply to a statutory form power of attorney except when there is a conflicting provision in this part, in which case the provision of this part governs, or when a provision of this division is expressly made inapplicable to a statutory form power of attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 113, Sec. 4.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4408.

Nothing in this part affects or limits the use of any other form for a power of attorney. A form that complies with the requirements of any law other than the provisions of this part may be used instead of the form set forth in Section 4401, and none of the provisions of this part apply if the other form is used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4409.

(a) A statutory short form power of attorney executed before, on, or after the repeal of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2450) of Title 9 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code by Chapter 986 of the Statutes of 1990, using a form that complied with former Section 2450 of the Civil Code, as originally enacted by Chapter 602 of the Statutes of 1984, or as amended by Chapter 403 of the Statutes of 1985, is as valid as if Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2450) of Title 9 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code had not been repealed by,
 and former Section 2511 of the Civil Code amended by, Chapter 986 of the Statutes of 1990.

(b) A statutory form power of attorney executed before, on, or after the repeal of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 2475) of Title 9 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code by the act that enacted this section, using a form that complied with the repealed chapter of the Civil Code is as valid as if that chapter had not been repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 300, Sec. 11.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Construction of Powers [4450. - 4465.]

4450.

By executing a statutory form power of attorney with respect to a subject listed in Section 4401, the principal, except as limited or extended by the principal in the power of attorney, empowers the agent, for that subject, to do all of the following:

(a) Demand, receive, and obtain by litigation or otherwise, money or other thing of value to which the principal is, may become, or claims to be entitled, and conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything so received for the purposes intended.

(b) Contract in any manner with any person, on terms agreeable to the agent, to accomplish a purpose of a transaction, and perform, rescind, reform, release, or modify the contract or another contract made by or on behalf of the principal.

(c) Execute, acknowledge, seal, and deliver a deed, revocation, mortgage, lease, notice, check, release, or other instrument the agent considers desirable to accomplish a purpose of a transaction.

(d) Prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, a claim existing in favor of or against the principal or intervene in litigation relating to the claim.

(e) Seek on the principal’s behalf the assistance of a court to carry out an act authorized by the power of attorney.

(f) Engage, compensate, and discharge an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or other assistant.

(g) Keep appropriate records of each transaction, including an accounting of receipts and disbursements.

(h) Prepare, execute, and file a record, report, or other document the agent considers desirable to safeguard or promote the principal’s interest under a statute or governmental regulation.

(i) Reimburse the agent for expenditures properly made by the agent in exercising the powers granted by the power of attorney.

(j) In general, do any other lawful act with respect to the subject.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4451.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to real property transactions empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Accept as a gift or as security for a loan, reject, demand, buy, lease, receive, or otherwise acquire, an interest in real property or a right incident to real property.

(b) Sell, exchange, convey with or without covenants, quitclaim, release, surrender, mortgage, encumber, partition, consent to partitioning, subdivide, apply for zoning, rezoning, or other governmental permits, plat or consent to platting, develop, grant options concerning, lease, sublease, or otherwise dispose of, an interest in real property or a right incident to real property.

(c) Release, assign, satisfy, and enforce by litigation or otherwise, a mortgage, deed of trust, encumbrance, lien, or other claim to real property which exists or is asserted.

(d) Do any act of management or of conservation with respect to an interest in real property, or a right incident to real property, owned, or claimed to be owned, by the principal, including all of the following:

(1) Insuring against a casualty, liability, or loss.

(2) Obtaining or regaining possession, or protecting the interest or right, by litigation or otherwise.

(3) Paying, compromising, or contesting taxes or assessments, or applying for and receiving refunds in connection with them.

(4) Purchasing supplies, hiring assistance or labor, and making repairs or alterations in the real property.

(e) Use, develop, alter, replace, remove, erect, or install structures or other improvements upon real property in or incident to which the principal has, or claims to have, an interest or right.

(f) Participate in a reorganization with respect to real property or a legal entity that owns an interest in or right incident to real property and receive and hold shares of stock or obligations received in a plan of reorganization, and act with respect to them, including all of the following:

(1) Selling or otherwise disposing of them.

(2) Exercising or selling an option, conversion, or similar right with respect to them.

(3) Voting them in person or by proxy.

(g) Change the form of title of an interest in or right incident to real property.

(h) Dedicate to public use, with or without consideration, easements or other real property in which the principal has, or claims to have, an interest or right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4452.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to tangible personal property transactions empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Accept as a gift or as security for a loan, reject, demand, buy, receive, or otherwise acquire ownership or possession of tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property.

(b) Sell, exchange, convey with or without covenants, release, surrender, mortgage, encumber, pledge, hypothecate, create a security interest in, pawn, grant options concerning, lease, sublease to others, or otherwise dispose of tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property.

(c) Release, assign, satisfy, or enforce by litigation or otherwise, a mortgage, security interest, encumbrance, lien, or other claim on behalf of the principal, with respect to tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property.

(d) Do an act of management or conservation with respect to tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property on behalf of the principal, including all of the following:

(1) Insuring against casualty, liability, or loss.

(2) Obtaining or regaining possession, or protecting the property or interest, by litigation or otherwise.

(3) Paying, compromising, or contesting taxes or assessments or applying for and receiving refunds in connection with taxes or assessments.

(4) Moving from place to place.

(5) Storing for hire or on a gratuitous bailment.

(6) Using, altering, and making repairs or alterations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4453.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to stock and bond transactions empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Buy, sell, and exchange stocks, bonds, mutual funds, and all other types of securities and financial instruments except commodity futures contracts and call and put options on stocks and stock indexes.

(b) Receive certificates and other evidences of ownership with respect to securities.

(c) Exercise voting rights with respect to securities in person or by proxy, enter into voting trusts, and consent to limitations on the right to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4454.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to commodity and option transactions empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Buy, sell, exchange, assign, settle, and exercise commodity futures contracts and call and put options on stocks and stock indexes traded on a regulated option exchange.

(b) Establish, continue, modify, and terminate option accounts with a broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4455.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to banking and other financial institution transactions empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Continue, modify, and terminate an account or other banking arrangement made by or on behalf of the principal.

(b) Establish, modify, and terminate an account or other banking arrangement with a bank, trust company, savings and loan association, credit union, thrift company, industrial loan company, brokerage firm, or other financial institution selected by the agent.

(c) Hire or close a safe deposit box or space in a vault.

(d) Contract to procure other services available from a financial institution as the agent considers desirable.

(e) Withdraw by check, order, or otherwise money or property of the principal deposited with or left in the custody of a financial institution.

(f) Receive bank statements, vouchers, notices, and similar documents from a financial institution and act with respect to them.

(g) Enter a safe deposit box or vault and withdraw or add to the contents.

(h) Borrow money at an interest rate agreeable to the agent and pledge as security personal property of the principal necessary in order to borrow, pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal.

(i) Make, assign, draw, endorse, discount, guarantee, and negotiate promissory notes, checks, drafts, and other negotiable or nonnegotiable paper of the principal, or payable to the principal or the principal’s order, receive the cash or other proceeds of those transactions, and accept a draft drawn by a person upon the principal and pay it when due.

(j) Receive for the principal and act upon a sight draft, warehouse receipt, or other negotiable or nonnegotiable instrument.

(k) Apply for and receive letters of credit, credit cards, and traveler’s checks from a financial institution, and give an indemnity or other agreement in connection with letters of credit.

(l) Consent to an extension of the time of payment with respect to commercial paper or a financial transaction with a financial institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to business operating transactions empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Operate, buy, sell, enlarge, reduce, and terminate a business interest.

(b) To the extent that an agent is permitted by law to act for a principal and subject to the terms of the partnership agreement:

(1) Perform a duty or discharge a liability and exercise a right, power, privilege, or option that the principal has, may have, or claims to have, under a partnership agreement, whether or not the principal is a partner.

(2) Enforce the terms of a partnership agreement by litigation or otherwise.

(3) Defend, submit to arbitration, settle, or compromise litigation to which the principal is a party because of membership in the partnership.

(c) Exercise in person or by proxy, or enforce by litigation or otherwise, a right, power, privilege, or option the principal has or claims to have as the holder of a bond, share, or other instrument of similar character, and defend, submit to arbitration, settle, or compromise litigation to which the principal is a party because of a bond, share, or similar instrument.

(d) With respect to a business owned solely by the principal:

(1) Continue, modify, renegotiate, extend, and terminate a contract made with an individual or a legal entity, firm, association, or corporation by or on behalf of the principal with respect to the business before execution of the power of attorney.

(2) Determine the policy of the business as to (A) the location of its operation, (B) the nature and extent of its business, (C) the methods of manufacturing, selling, merchandising, financing, accounting, and advertising employed in its operation, (D) the amount and types of insurance carried, and (E) the mode of engaging, compensating, and dealing with its accountants, attorneys, and other agents and employees.

(3) Change the name or form of organization under which the business is operated and enter into a partnership agreement with other persons or organize a corporation to take over all or part of the operation of the business.

(4) Demand and receive money due or claimed by the principal or on the principal’s behalf in the operation of the business, and control and disburse the money in the operation of the business.

(e) Put additional capital into a business in which the principal has an interest.

(f) Join in a plan of reorganization, consolidation, or merger of the business.

(g) Sell or liquidate a business or part of it at the time and upon the terms the agent considers desirable.

(h) Represent the principal in establishing the value of a business under a buy-out agreement to which the principal is a party.

(i) Prepare, sign, file, and deliver reports, compilations of information, returns, or other papers with respect to a business which are required by a governmental agency or instrumentality or which the agent considers desirable, and make related payments.

(j) Pay, compromise, or contest taxes or assessments and do any other act which the agent considers desirable to protect the principal from illegal or unnecessary taxation, fines, penalties, or assessments with respect to a business, including attempts to recover, in any manner permitted by law, money paid before or after the execution of the power of attorney.
